Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITATION.new text end new text begin This act may be cited as the "Brady Aune and Joseph Anderson Safety Act." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.615, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance; validity. (a) The commissioner may issue a state general permit to a governmental subdivision or to the general public to conduct one or more projects described in this subdivision. The commissioner may issue permits, with or without a fee, to: (1) gather or harvest aquatic plants, or plant parts, other than wild rice from public waters; (2) transplant aquatic plants into public waters; (3) destroy harmful or undesirable aquatic vegetation or organisms in public waters under prescribed conditions to protect the waters, desirable species of fish, vegetation, other forms of aquatic life, and the public. (b) Application for a permit and a notification to request authorization to conduct a project under a general permit must be accompanied by a fee, if required. (c) An aquatic plant management permit is valid for one growing season and expires on December 31 of the year it is issued unless the commissioner stipulates a different expiration date in rule or in the permit. (d) A general permit may authorize a project for more than one growing season. new text begin (e) To receive a commercial mechanical control permit under this section, the applicant must inform the commissioner whether scuba diving equipment will be used during any activity authorized by the permit. If the applicant indicates that scuba diving equipment will be used: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner must provide the applicant with the information sheet required under section 182.679, subdivision 7; and new text end new text begin (2) the applicant must provide documentation to the commissioner verifying that a third-party on-site hazard survey was completed in the last year by a qualified safety professional who observed the applicant's work using scuba diving equipment. The documentation must include a written report of the findings and recommendations to reduce the risk of injury or illness to employees that are scuba diving. The written report must include an evaluation of specific safety practices, equipment, and training. A qualified safety professional includes: new text end new text begin (i) a Department of Labor and Industry workplace safety and health consultant; new text end new text begin (ii) a workers' compensation loss-control representative, with approval from an insurance underwriter; or new text end new text begin (iii) a private safety consultant. new text end new text begin (f) The holder of a commercial mechanical control permit may not use scuba equipment for permitted activities unless the permittee informed the commissioner at the time of the application that scuba diving equipment would be used and complied with all other requirements of paragraph (e). A permittee who is prohibited from using scuba equipment under this paragraph must apply for a new permit under paragraph (e) in order to do so. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to permits issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.615, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Permit standards. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner shall, by rule, prescribe standards to issue and deny permits under this section. The standards must ensure that aquatic plant control is consistent with shoreland conservation ordinances, lake management plans and programs, and wild and scenic river plans. new text begin (b) The commissioner may not issue or renew a commercial mechanical control permit under this section to any person who: new text end new text begin (1) has received a citation for one or more willful violations of an occupational safety and health standard adopted under chapter 182 involving scuba diving during the previous two years; or new text end new text begin (2) has contested a citation for one or more willful violations of an occupational safety and health standard adopted under chapter 182 involving scuba diving during the pendency of a contested case. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may not issue or renew a commercial mechanical control permit under this section to a successor person. "Successor person" means a person that shares three or more of the following with the person who received or contested a violation under paragraph (b): new text end new text begin (1) has one or more of the same owners, members, principals, officers, or managers; new text end new text begin (2) performs similar work within the state of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (3) has one or more of the same telephone or fax numbers; new text end new text begin (4) has one or more of the same email addresses or websites; new text end new text begin (5) employs or engages substantially the same individuals to provide or perform services; new text end new text begin (6) uses substantially the same vehicles, facilities, or equipment; or new text end new text begin (7) lists or advertises substantially the same project experience and portfolio of work. new text end new text begin (d) If a commercial mechanical control permit holder is found to have used scuba gear in violation of section 103G.615, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), the commissioner must revoke the permit. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner of labor and industry must provide the commissioner of natural resources with timely information necessary to implement this subdivision, subject to section 182.66, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [182.679] COMMERCIAL DIVING OPERATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) This section applies to persons who are conducting scuba diving at a place of employment when making improvements to land, including the removal of aquatic plants. new text end new text begin (b) Issuing a permit under section 103G.615 alone does not make the commissioner of natural resources an employer of the permit holder or the permit holder's employees. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certifications required for commercial diving operations. new text end new text begin No employer may allow any individual subject to this section to conduct scuba diving unless that individual has a valid open water scuba diver certificate or a more advanced certificate received from a nationally recognized and accredited certification program or agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Equipment requirements. new text end new text begin An employer must require the use of the following equipment when an individual subject to this section is scuba diving: new text end new text begin (1) a buoyancy-control device; new text end new text begin (2) an illuminated dive beacon; new text end new text begin (3) a depth-monitoring device; new text end new text begin (4) fins, mask, and snorkel; new text end new text begin (5) a compressed gas cylinder and valve; new text end new text begin (6) a primary regulator and alternate air source; new text end new text begin (7) a breathing-gas monitoring device; new text end new text begin (8) a quick-release weight system and weights; new text end new text begin (9) adequate exposure protection appropriate for local dive conditions; new text end new text begin (10) at least one audible emergency surface-signaling device; and new text end new text begin (11) a dive computer or recreational dive planner (RDP). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Standby diver required. new text end new text begin An employer must ensure that a standby diver is available while a diver is in the water. No employer may allow an individual to act as a standby diver unless that individual has a valid rescue diver certificate received from a nationally recognized and accredited certification program. An extra breathing gas hose capable of supplying breathing gas to the diver in the water must be available to the standby diver. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin First aid and CPR training required. new text end new text begin An employer shall require that all individuals subject to this section conducting scuba diving are trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and first aid, the American Red Cross standard course or equivalent. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin An employer may be cited by the commissioner for violations of subdivisions 2 to 5. Citations are punishable under section 182.666. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Information for employers. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop an information sheet for employers who have or intend to have one or more employees use scuba diving equipment in the workplace. The information sheet must explain the requirements of this section and include any applicable federal requirements for employers. The commissioner must post the information sheet on the department's website. The commissioner must also deliver the information sheet to the commissioner of natural resources to provide to businesses according to section 103G.615, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective May 1, 2025. new text end